Illinois, session 104th, SB2891.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by changing 5Sections 3.3 and 3.5 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/3.3)7    Sec. 3.3. Adoption of dogs and cats. 8    (a) An animal shelter or animal control facility shall not 9adopt out any dog or adopt out or return to field any cat 10unless it has been sterilized and microchipped. The animal 11shelter or animal control facility shall register the 12microchip in a national database with the adoptive owner's 13information at the time of adoption. The animal shelter or 14animal control facility shall retain documentation of the 15microchip and registration, which shall be searchable by 16microchip number. However, an animal shelter or animal control 17facility may adopt out a dog or cat that has not been 18sterilized and microchipped if the adopting owner has executed 19a written agreement to have sterilizing and microchipping 20procedures performed within 14 days after a licensed 21veterinarian certifies the dog or cat is healthy enough for 22sterilizing and microchipping procedures and a licensed 23veterinarian has certified that the dog or cat is too sick or   SB2891 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 15680 AAS 28857 b1injured to be sterilized or it would be detrimental to the 2health of the dog or cat to be sterilized or microchipped at 3the time of the adoption.4    (b) An animal shelter or animal control facility may adopt 5out any dog or cat that is not free of disease, injury, or 6abnormality if the disease, injury, or abnormality is 7disclosed in writing to the adopter, and the animal shelter or 8animal control facility allows the adopter to return the 9animal to the animal shelter or animal control facility.10    (c) The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this 11Section do not apply to adoptions subject to Section 11 of the 12Animal Control Act.13    (d) An animal shelter or animal control facility may waive 14the adoption fee for a dog or cat if the person adopting the 15dog or cat:16        (1) presents to the animal shelter or animal control 17    facility a current and valid Illinois driver's license 18    with the word "veteran" printed on its face, a current and 19    valid Illinois Identification Card with the word "veteran" 20    printed on its face, or an identification card issued 21    under the federal Veterans Identification Card Act of 2015 22    and a valid Illinois driver's license or valid Illinois 23    Identification Card; and24        (2) complies with the adoption policies of the animal 25    shelter or animal control facility. 26    (e) An animal shelter or animal control facility may limit   SB2891 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 15680 AAS 28857 b1the number of dogs or cats adopted from that animal shelter or 2animal control facility pursuant to this Section to one dog or 3cat each in a 2-year period. 4    (f) If, at any time after adoption, the adopted animal 5comes into the possession of an animal control agency, a law 6enforcement agency, another animal shelter, or a veterinarian 7and the agency, shelter, or veterinarian requests information 8pertaining to the identity and whereabouts of the animal's 9adopter or the history of the animal, the adopting agency 10shall, within one business day, provide that information to 11the requesting agency, shelter, or veterinarian. 12(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-434, eff. 1-1-24; 13103-678, eff. 1-1-25.) 14    (225 ILCS 605/3.5)15    Sec. 3.5. Information on dogs and cats available for 16adoption by an animal shelter or animal control facility.17    (a) An animal shelter or animal control facility must 18provide to the adopter prior to the time of adoption the 19following information, to the best of its knowledge, on any 20dog or cat being offered for adoption:21        (1) The breed, age, date of birth, sex, and color of 22    the dog or cat if known, or if unknown, the animal shelter 23    or animal control facility shall estimate to the best of 24    its ability.25        (2) The details of any inoculation or medical   SB2891 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 15680 AAS 28857 b1    treatment that the dog or cat received while under the 2    possession of the animal shelter or animal control 3    facility.4        (3) The adoption fee and any additional fees or 5    charges.6        (4) If the dog or cat was returned by an adopter, then 7    the date and reason for the return.8        (5) Any behavior noted during interactions with the 9    dog, including intake, walks, playgroups, socialization 10    sessions, medical examinations, and other assessments.11        (6) Information describing whether the dog has killed 12    a companion animal or livestock or has been deemed a 13    dangerous dog under Section 15.1 of the Animal Control Act 14    and any restrictions that may apply to the dog, if known.15        (7) Information describing whether the dog or cat has 16    bitten any person at the facility or prior to admission. 17        (8) (5) The following written statement: "A copy of 18    our policy regarding warranties, refunds, or returns is 19    available upon request.".20        (9) (6) The license number of the animal shelter or 21    animal control facility issued by the Illinois Department 22    of Agriculture. 23    (b) The information required in subsection (a) shall be 24provided to the adopter in written form by the animal shelter 25or animal control facility and shall have an acknowledgement 26of disclosures form, which must be signed by the adopter and an   SB2891 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 15680 AAS 28857 b1authorized representative of the animal shelter or animal 2control facility at the time of the adoption. The 3acknowledgement of disclosures form shall include the 4following:5        (1) A blank space for the dated signature and printed 6    name of the authorized representative handling the 7    adoption on behalf of the animal shelter or animal control 8    facility, which shall be immediately beneath the following 9    printed statement: "I hereby attest that all of the above 10    information is true and correct to the best of my 11    knowledge.".12        (2) A blank space for the dated signature and printed 13    name of the adopter, which shall be immediately beneath 14    the following statement: "I hereby attest that this 15    disclosure regarding was posted on or near the cage of the 16    dog or cat for adoption was presented to me and that I have 17    read all the disclosures. I further understand that I am 18    entitled to keep a signed copy of this disclosure.".19    (c) A copy of the disclosures and the signed 20acknowledgement of disclosures form shall be provided to the 21adopter and the original copy shall be maintained by the 22animal shelter or animal control facility for a period of 2 23years from the date of adoption. A copy of the animal shelter's 24or animal control facility's policy regarding warranties, 25refunds, or returns shall be provided to the adopter.26    (d) An animal shelter or animal control facility is   SB2891 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 15680 AAS 28857 b1prohibited from offering for adoption or transfer, giving 2away, rehoming, or placing any dog determined to be a vicious 3dog under Section 15 of the Animal Control Act. An animal 4shelter or animal control facility shall post in a conspicuous 5place in writing on or near the cage of any dog or cat 6available for adoption the information required by subsection 7(a) of this Section 3.5.8(Source: P.A. 96-1470, eff. 1-1-11.)